Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1741.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-189.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-189.08. Released time courses; requirements; private cause of action A. Each charter school governing body shall allow students to attend a released time course during regular school hours if all of the following requirements are met: 1. The school receives written consent from the parent of each participating student. 2. The provider of the released time course does all of the following: (a) Records the attendance of each participating student and provides copies of the attendance records to the charter school. (b) Assumes all legal responsibility for each participating student while the student is under the provider's control. (c) Provides religious instruction to participating students for at least one hour but not more than five hours per week. (d) Demonstrates that the instructor of the released time course has similar qualifications as instructors who are employed by the charter school. 3. Any necessary transportation services relating to a released time course are provided by the released time course provider, participating students or the parents of participating students. 4. Each participating student is responsible for completing any schoolwork that the student misses because the student attends a released time course. B. Each charter school that allows students to attend a released time course pursuant to subsection A of this section shall: 1. Award academic credit to each student who successfully completes the released time course. The charter school shall determine how much credit to award for the released time course by using only secular criteria that are substantially the same as the criteria that the charter school uses to evaluate similar courses, including any of the following: (a) The number of hours of classroom instructional time. (b) The course requirements and instructional materials that are used for the released time course according to the syllabus. (c) Student assessments that are conducted by the released time course provider. 2. Count any time that a student spends participating in a released time course during regular school hours as instructional time and instructional hours to meet the requirements prescribed in sections 15-797, 15-808 and 15-901 and to determine average daily membership and daily attendance. C. A charter school may not: 1. Incur expenses to provide a released time course. 2. Allow a released time course to be provided on school property. D. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section, A charter school may not deny any released time course provider equal access to monies, benefits or services that the charter school provides to other community groups or independent entities. E. Any person who is adversely affected by a violation of this section has a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable court costs, reasonable attorney fees and any other relief available under law against the charter school. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 15, chapter 3, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-341.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-341.02. Released time courses; requirements; private cause of action A. Each school district governing board shall allow students to attend a released time course during regular school hours if all of the following requirements are met: 1. The school receives written consent from the parent of each participating student. 2. The provider of the released time course does all of the following: (a) Records the attendance of each participating student and provides copies of the attendance records to the school district. (b) Assumes all legal responsibility for each participating student while the student is under the provider's control. (c) Provides religious instruction to participating students for at least one hour but not more than five hours per week. (d) Demonstrates that the instructor of the released time course has similar qualifications as teachers who are employed by the school district. 3. Any necessary transportation services relating to a released time course are provided by the released time course provider, participating students or the parents of participating students. 4. Each participating student is responsible for completing any schoolwork that the student misses because the student attends a released time course. B. Each school district that allows students to attend a released time course pursuant to subsection A of this section shall: 1. Award academic credit to each student who successfully completes the released time course. The school district shall determine how much credit to award for the released time course by using only secular criteria that are substantially the same as the criteria that the school district uses to evaluate similar courses, including any of the following: (a) The number of hours of classroom instructional time. (b) The course requirements and instructional materials that are used for the released time course according to the syllabus. (c) Student assessments that are conducted by the released time course provider. 2. Count any time that a student spends participating in a released time course during regular school hours as instructional time and instructional hours to meet the requirements prescribed in sections 15-797, 15-808 and 15-901 and to determine average daily membership and daily attendance. C. A school district may not: 1. Incur expenses to provide a released time course. 2. Allow a released time course to be provided on school property. D. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section, A school district may not deny any released time course provider equal access to monies, benefits or services that the school district provides to other community groups or independent entities. E. Any person who is adversely affected by a violation of this section has a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable court costs, reasonable attorney fees and any other relief available under law against the school district. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona Released Time Education Act".